Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-206
Assistance and expertise; provided by single finance and development entity; legislative findings.

The Legislature further finds that:

(1) In many instances local communities, citizens of the state, and private enterprise lack the knowledge and technical expertise necessary to take advantage of the public purpose financings offered by the Nebraska Mortgage Finance Fund, the Nebraska Development Finance Fund, the Agricultural Development Corporation, and local industrial development revenue bond options, resulting in less than full realization of the public purpose benefits of such financings to the state and its citizens;

(2) It is in the interest of the state and its citizens, as well as local communities, to provide assistance and expertise to enable local communities, citizens, and private enterprise to more fully realize the benefits available to the general public; and

(3) Such assistance and expertise can be provided by a single quasi-governmental entity with a professional staff.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 6.